Utah statutes.
31A-37-302.   Investment requirements.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), an association captive insurance company, a sponsored captive insurance company, and an industrial insured group shall comply with the investment requirements contained in this title.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a) and any other provision of this title, the commissioner may approve the use of alternative reliable methods of valuation and rating under Section 31A-37-106 for:

(i)  an association captive insurance company;

(ii)  a sponsored captive insurance company; or

(iii)  an industrial insured group.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a pure captive insurance company or industrial insured captive insurance company is not subject to any restrictions on allowable investments contained in this title.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the commissioner may, under Section 31A-37-106, prohibit or limit an investment that threatens the solvency or liquidity of:

(i)  a pure captive insurance company; or

(ii)  an industrial insured captive insurance company.

(3) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(a)(ii), a captive insurance company may not make loans to:

(A)  the parent company of the captive insurance company; or

(B)  an affiliate of the captive insurance company.

(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a)(i), a pure captive insurance company may make loans to:

(A)  the parent company of the pure captive insurance company; or

(B)  an affiliate of the pure captive insurance company.

(b)  A loan under Subsection (3)(a):

(i)  may be made only on the prior written approval of the commissioner; and

(ii)  shall be evidenced by a note in a form approved by the commissioner.

(c)  A pure captive insurance company may not make a loan from:

(i)  the paid-in capital required under Subsection 31A-37-204(1); or

(ii)  the free surplus required under Subsection 31A-37-205(1).

